Illinois, session 104th, HB39.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Time Standardization Act is amended by 5changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 440/1)  (from Ch. 1, par. 3201)7    Sec. 1. Notwithstanding how time is advanced pursuant to 8the federal Uniform Time Act of 1966, 15 USC 260a, at At two 9o'clock ante meridian of the second Sunday in March of 2026 10each year, the standard time in this State shall be advanced 11one hour. Thereafter, daylight saving time shall be the 12year-round standard time of the entire State , and at two 13o'clock ante meridian of the first Sunday in November of each 14year the standard time in this State shall, by the retarding of 15one hour, be made to coincide with the mean astronomical time 16of the ninety degrees of longitude West from Greenwich, the 17standard official time of which is described as United States 18standard central time, so that between the second Sunday of 19March at two o'clock ante meridian in each year and the first 20Sunday in November at two o'clock ante meridian in each year 21the standard time in this State shall be one hour in advance of 22the United States standard central time: Provided, however, 23that nothing in this Act shall be so construed as to be in   HB0039- 2 -LRB104 03567 BDA 13591 b1contravention of any federal law or authorized order of the 2Interstate Commerce Commission with respect to the time zones 3of the United States. And in all laws, statutes, orders, 4judgments, rules and regulations relating to the time of 5performance of any act of any officer or department of this 6State, or of any county, township, city or town, municipal 7corporation, agency or instrumentality of the State, or school 8district or school authority or relating to the time in which 9any rights shall accrue or determine, or within which any act 10shall or shall not be performed by any person subject to the 11jurisdiction of the State, and in all the public schools and in 12all institutions of the State, or of any county, township, 13city or town, municipal corporation, agency or instrumentality 14of the State or school district or school authority, and in all 15contracts or choses in action made or to be performed in the 16State, it shall be understood and intended that the time shall 17be the time prescribed in this Section.18    If the date on which time is to be advanced one hour, the 19date on which time is to be retarded one hour, or both, as set 20forth under Section 260a of the federal Uniform Time Act of 211966 (15 U.S.C. 260a), as now or hereafter amended, 22renumbered, or succeeded, differs from either or both of those 23dates as set forth under this Section, then the dates set forth 24under the federal law shall control and shall apply in 25Illinois, notwithstanding the dates set forth in this Section. 26(Source: P.A. 95-725, eff. 6-30-08.)   HB0039- 3 -LRB104 03567 BDA 13591 b1    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 2becoming law.